Utah statutes.
75-5-305.   Acceptance of appointment -- Consent to jurisdiction.
By accepting appointment, a guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of
the court in any proceeding relating to the guardianship that may be
instituted by any interested person or any person interested in the welfare of
the ward. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the guardian or
mailed to him by ordinary mail at his address as listed in the court records
and to his address as then known to the petitioner.
